Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF367.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2650XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 367 Section 1. Section 124.204, subsection 4, Code 2025, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . cn. Kratom, meaning any parts of the plant 3 Mitragyna speciosa, whether growing or not, and any compound, 4 manufacture, salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of 5 that plant, including but not limited to mitragynine and 6 7-hydroxymitragynine. 7